test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-list_3st_id_gt-norm.gen.yaml
    čiehâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čiehâl
    čiehčâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čiehčâs
    čiepâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čieppâst
    čierâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čierâst
    šietkâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sietkâst
    šiettâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šiettâd
    čievâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čievvâd
    čievârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čievvârd
    čievâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čievâst
    čikkááttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čikkát
    čiähániđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čiähánâm
    šiälgudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šiälgud
    čiälgáttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čiälgát
    šiämáttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šiämáát
    čiäpášiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čiäppáš
    čiärudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čiärud
    čiärustiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čiärust
    šiärániđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šiärrán
    čiäráttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čiäráát
    šiätudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šiättud
    šiäđudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šiäđđud
    šišnástiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šišnáást
    čiŋŋuustiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čiŋŋust
    čuhâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuuhâl
    čujottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuujoot
    šumbârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šuumbârd
    šumpârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šuumpârd
    šurijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šuurijd
    šuvijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šuuvijd
    šuđijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šuuđijd
    čučârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuuččârd
    culijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cuulijd
    huihádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huuihád
    hulijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huulijd
    humijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huumijd
    humáskiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huumáásk
    huridiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huuriid
    hurijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huurijd
    hutâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huuttâg
    hutârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huuttârd
    julestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juuleest
    julijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juulijd
    jumbârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juumbârd
    jumijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juumijd
    jurdijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juurijd
    jurdâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juurdâš
    jurmâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juurmâg
    jurmâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juurmâst
    jurâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juurâd
    jurâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juurât
    jutâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juuttâl
    juvâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juuvvât
    kuhâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuuhâst
    kuhâštiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuuhâšt
    kuikettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuuiket
    kujestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuujeest
    kulgijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuulgijd
    kulgâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuulgâd
    kulgâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuulgât
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kullut
    kulnâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuulnâd
    kulâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuulât
    kuoŋŋuuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuoŋŋut
    kurâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuurât
    kuvdâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuuvdâd
    kuvdâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuuvdâst
    kuđijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuuđijd
    kužâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuužžâd
    luvâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: luuvvâst
    luvâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: luuvât
    luŋâniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: luuŋŋân
    mudârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muuddârd
    mugâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muugâg
    muigâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muuigâg
    mulgâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muulgâst
    mulijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muulijd
    mullârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muullârd
    murijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muurijd
    murâniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muurrân
    murâštiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muurâšt
    muvgâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muuvgâg
    muvrediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muuvred
    muštâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muuštâš
    mučâsmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muuččâsm
    mučâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muuččâš
    nuhâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuuhâst
    nulpâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuulpâg
    nurdâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuurdâst
    nurâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuurâd
    nurâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuurrâl
    nutâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuuttâg
    nuvâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuuvvât
    nuđhâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuuđhât
    pugârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puugârd
    pulijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puulijd
    puljârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puuljârd
    punjâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puunjâg
    punjâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puunjâst
    purgijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puurgijd
    purjâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puurjâst
    purâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puurâd
    puzijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puuzijd
    puđâldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puuđâld
    ruŋkâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruuŋkât
    ružâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruužžâg
    sujâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suujâd
    sujâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suujât
    sutâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suuttâd
    suvrâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suuvrâst
    suvčâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suuvčâg
    tubdâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuubdâst
    tubdâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuubdâd
    turediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuureed
    turijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuurijd
    turpâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuurpâg
    turvâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuurvâst
    turáttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuuráát
    turâštiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuurâšt
    tutâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuuttâd
    tuvhestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuuvhest
    tuđhâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuuđhât
    tuđâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuuđât
    ucâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uuccâl
    ulâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uulât
    umástiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uumáást
    unjijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uunjijd
    urmâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uurmâst
    usâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uusâd
    usâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uusât
    uvestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uuveest
    uđâsmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uuđâsm
    uđâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uuđâst
    čuoccuuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuoccut
    šuvettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šuvveet
    huhkádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huhkáád
    huksiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huksit
    hurediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hurreed
    hurgettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hurgeet
    hurgottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hurgoot
    hurtodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hurttood
    huškottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huškoot
    hušottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huššoot
    cuoigiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cuoigiim
    cuovkkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cuovkkit
    huolâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huolât
    cuávgááttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cuávgát
    cuáŋuliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cuáŋŋul
    huálištiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huálišt
    huálšistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huálšist
    huánániđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huánnán
    huánášiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huánááš
    huáputtiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huápput
    huárástiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huáráást
    huátistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huátist
    huávridiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huávrid
    huávristiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huávrist
    huávráskiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huávrásk
    juhottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juhhoot
    julediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: julleed
    juovâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juovvâd
    juovâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juovvâš
    juoŋâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juoŋŋâd
    juoŋâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juoŋâst
    jurgâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jurgâl
    jurmâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jurmâs
    juvliistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juvlist
    juálguštiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juálgušt
    juálániđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juállán
    juánušiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juánnuš
    juárbudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juárbud
    kuhediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuhheed
    kuhostiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuhhoost
    kuhášiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuhhááš
    kuobârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuobbârd
    kuocijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuocijd
    kuocâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuoccâg
    kuodâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuoddâd
    kuodâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuoddâš
    kuohâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuohâst
    kuomâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuomâd
    kuorâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuorâd
    kuorâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuorrâs
    kuoskâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuoskât
    kuossâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuossâl
    kuosâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuossâl
    kuovlâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuovlâl
    kuovskistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuovskist
    kuovskâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuovskâst
    kuovâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuovvâd
    kuovâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuovvâst
    kuođâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuođât
    kurpettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kurppeet
    kurpostiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kurppoost
    kuálustiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuállust
    kuálástiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuáláást
    kuápuliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuáppul
    kuáputtiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuápput
    kuárgudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuárgud
    kuáridiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuárrid
    kuárjidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuárjid
    kuárusmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuárusm
    kuáruttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuárut
    kuárvittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuárvit
    kuárániđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuárrán
    kuárŋuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuárŋut
    kuástidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuástid
    kuávgudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuávgud
    kuávšudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuávšud
    kuáškuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuáškuttâm
    kuáđuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuáđut
    kuškâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuškâd
    kušottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuššoot
    luodâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: luodâst
    luovâniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: luovvân
    luovâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: luovât
    luptiistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: luptist
    luágustiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: luágust
    luámuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: luámut
    luávittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: luávit
    luávádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: luávvád
    luáčániđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: luáččán
    luŋŋiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: luŋŋit
    muggâriđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muggâr
    mulžáttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mulžáát
    muotâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muotâš
    murdettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: murdeet
    muttâniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muttân
    muáculiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muácul
    muáittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muáitám
    muáráskiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muáráásk
    muávrádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muávrád
    muštottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muštoot
    muštâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muštâl
    mučásmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muččáásm
    nubásmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nubbáásm
    nuhostiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuhhoost
    nulhediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nulheed
    nuládiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nulláád
    nuolâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuollâs
    nuolâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuolâst
    nuolâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nuolâttâm
    nuorâsmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nuorâsm
    nuorâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuorrâš
    nuoskušiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuoskuš
    nurvostiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nurvoost
    nurvottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nurvoot
    nuálusiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuállus
    nuárvádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuárvád
    nuáskudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuáskud
    nuáskášiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuáskáš
    nuávdittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuávdit
    nuáđásiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuáđđás
    pulčettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pulččeet
    punjâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: punnjâs
    puolâštiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puolâšt
    puosâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puosâd
    puovnjâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puovnjâd
    puovtâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puovtâd
    purgiistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: purgist
    pusediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pusseed
    putestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: putteest
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puttáásm
    puáhuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puáhut
    puákkudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puákkut
    puákuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puákut
    puánjostiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puánjoos
    puánjustiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puánjust
    puárskudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puárskud
    puáruttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puárut
    puárániđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puárrán
    puárásmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puáráásm
    puáskuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puáskut
    puátiliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puáttil
    puáđhudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puáđhud
    puáđistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puáđist
    puášudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puáššud
    puášáskiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puáššásk

    ruohâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruohâst
    ruoibiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruoibiim
    ruojijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruojijd
    ruojâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruojâst
    ruokâsmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruokkâsm
    ruomčâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruomčâst
    ruonijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruonijd
    ruonâsmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruonâsm
    ruosâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruosâd
    ruosâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruossâl
    ruosâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruosât
    ruotâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruottâd
    ruotâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruottâst
    ruotâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruottât
    rusádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: russáád
    ruttâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruttâd
    ruvviittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruvviittâm
    ruáhuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruáhut
    ruáhásiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruáhás
    ruákkášiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruákkáš
    ruákášiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruákkáš
    ruámustiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruámust
    ruámččááttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruámččát
    ruápittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruáppit
    ruápsudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruápsud
    ruástudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruástud
    ruáđidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruáđđid
    ruŋkestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruŋkkeest
    ruškodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruškood
    ruškottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruškoot
    rušmostiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: rušmoost
    suddodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suddod
    suddâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suddâd
    suládiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sulláád
    sundediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sundeed
    sundestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sundeest
    suogârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suoggârd
